Arkansas, session 2025, HB1573.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 10-3-101 is amended to read as follows:
10-3-101. Presession assignment of regular standing committees.
(a) The presession assignments of members of regular standing Senate
and House of Representatives committees and the designation of committee
chair and vice chair shall be made in the Senate pursuant to the Rules of the
Senate and in the House of Representatives by the Speaker-elect of the House
of Representatives as soon as is feasible after each biennial general
election.
(b) The following ten (10) standing committees shall be established
for the House of Representatives, in accordance with the Rules of the House
*MBM040*
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
of Representatives:
(1) House Committee on Education — matters pertaining to public
kindergarten, elementary, secondary, and adult education, vocational
education, vocational-technical schools, vocational rehabilitation, higher
education, private educational institutions, similar legislation, and
resolutions germane to the subject matter of the House Committee on
Education;
(2) House Committee on Public Safety, Corrections, and Inspector
General — matters pertaining to public safety, state and local courts, court
clerks and stenographers and other employees of the courts, civil and
criminal procedures, probate matters, civil and criminal laws, issues related
to the Department of Inspector General, similar matters, and resolutions
germane to the subject matter of the House Committee on Public Safety,
Corrections, and Inspector General;
(3) House Committee on Public Health and Human Services —
matters pertaining to public health, mental health, public welfare, human
relations and resources, intellectual and other developmental disabilities,
the aged and problems of aging, children and youth, similar legislation, and
resolutions germane to the subject matter of the House Committee on Public
Health and Human Services;
(4) House Committee on Commerce, Insurance, Labor and Licensing,
and Public Transportation — matters pertaining to banks and banking, savings
and loan associations, stocks, bonds, and other securities, securities
dealers, insurance, partnerships and corporations, home mortgage financing
and housing, labor and labor relations, industrial development, roads and
highways, city streets, county roads, highway safety, airports and air
transportation, common and contract carriers, mass transit, similar
legislation, and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the House
Committee on Commerce, Insurance, Labor and Licensing, and Public
Transportation;
(5) House Committee on Finance and Administration — matters
pertaining to the levy, increase, reduction, collection, enforcement and
administration of taxes and other revenue-producing measures, and resolutions
germane to the subject matter of the House Committee on Finance and
Administration;
(6) House Committee on Veterans and Military Affairs — matters
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
pertaining to the military, veterans, similar legislation, and resolutions
germane to the subject matter of the House Committee on Veterans and Military
Affairs;
(7) House Committee on Agriculture — matters pertaining to
agriculture, livestock, forestry, similar legislation, and resolutions
germane to the subject matter of the House Committee on Agriculture;
(8) House Committee on State Agencies, Transformation, and
Shared Services — matters pertaining to state government and state agencies,
except where the subject matter relates more appropriately to another
committee, proposed amendments to the Constitution of the State of Arkansas
or the United States Government, election laws and procedures, federal and
interstate relations, legislative affairs, memorials, other matters whenever
the subject matter is not germane to the subject matter of any other standing
committee, similar legislation, and resolutions germane to the subject matter
of the House Committee on State Agencies, Transformation, and Shared
Services;
(9) House Committee on City, County, Local Affairs, Parks,
Heritage, Tourism, and Game and Fish – matters pertaining to city and
municipal affairs, county affairs, local improvement districts, interlocal
government cooperation, parks, heritage, tourism, hunting, fishing, similar
legislation, and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the House
Committee on City, County, Local Affairs, Parks, Heritage, Tourism, and Game
and Fish; and
(10) House Committee on Energy, Environment, and Arkansas Public
Service Commission - matters pertaining to energy sources, energy supplies,
energy needs, energy problems, environmental affairs, water and air
pollution, natural resources, oil and gas, levees and drainage, rivers and
harbors, public utilities, similar legislation, and resolutions germane to
the subject matter of the House Committee on Energy, Environment, and
Arkansas Public Service Commission.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 10-3-203(3)(A), concerning subject matter
interim committees of the House of Representatives, is amended to read as
follows:
(3)(A) The following ten (10) subject matter interim committees of the
House of Representatives, each to consist of the members who compose the
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
respective standing committees of the House of Representatives having
comparable subject matter jurisdiction, plus such other nonvoting members as
may be selected pursuant to the Rules of the House of Representatives, who
shall be entitled to per diem and mileage for attending meetings of the
committees:
(i) House Committee on Education — matters
pertaining to public kindergarten, elementary, secondary, and adult
education, vocational education, vocational-technical schools, vocational
rehabilitation, higher education, private educational institutions, similar
legislation, and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the House
Committee on Education;
(ii) House Committee on Judiciary Public Safety,
Corrections, and Inspector General — matters pertaining to public safety,
state and local courts, court clerks and stenographers and other employees of
the courts, civil and criminal procedures, probate matters, civil and
criminal laws, issues related to the Department of Inspector General, similar
matters, and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the House Committee
on Judiciary Public Safety, Corrections, and Inspector General;
(iii) House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor and Human Services— matters pertaining to public health, mental health,
intellectual and other developmental disabilities, public welfare, human
relations and resources, environmental affairs, water and air pollution,
labor and labor relations, public welfare, human relations and resources,
intellectual and other developmental disabilities, the aged and problems of
aging, children and youth, similar legislation, and resolutions germane to
the subject matter of the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor and Human Services;
(iv) House Committee on Commerce, Insurance, Labor
and Licensing, and Public Transportation — matters pertaining to banks and
banking, savings and loan associations, stocks, bonds, and other securities,
securities dealers, insurance, partnerships and corporations, home mortgage
financing and housing, labor and labor relations, industrial development,
roads and highways, city streets, county roads, highway safety, airports and
air transportation, common and contract carriers, mass transit, similar
legislation, and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the House
Committee on Commerce, Insurance, Labor and Licensing, and Public
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
Transportation;
(v) House Committee on Revenue and Taxation Finance
and Administration — matters pertaining to the levy, increase, reduction,
collection, enforcement and administration of taxes and other revenue-
producing measures, and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the
House Committee on Revenue and Taxation Finance and Administration;
(vi) House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth,
Legislative Veterans and Military Affairs — matters pertaining to the aged
and problems of aging; children and youth, military, veterans, legislative
affairs, memorials, other matters whenever the subject matter is not germane
to the subject matter of any other standing committee, similar legislation,
and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the House Committee on
Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative Veterans and Military Affairs;
(vii) House Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and
Economic Development — matters pertaining to agriculture, livestock,
forestry, industrial development, natural resources, oil and gas, publicity
and parks, levee and drainage, rivers and harbors, similar legislation, and
resolutions germane to the subject matter of the House Committee on
Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development;
(viii) House Committee on City, County, and Local
Affairs — matters pertaining to city and municipal affairs, county affairs,
local improvement districts, interlocal government cooperation, similar
legislation, and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the House
Committee on City, County, and Local Affairs;
(ix) House Committee on Insurance and Commerce —
matters pertaining to banks and banking, savings and loan associations,
stock, bonds, and other securities, securities dealers, insurance, public
utilities, partnerships and corporations, home mortgage financing and
housing, similar legislation, and resolutions germane to the subject matter
of the House Committee on Insurance and Commerce; and
(x)(viii) House Committee on State Agencies, and
Governmental Affairs Transformation, and Shared Services — matters pertaining
to state government and state agencies, except where the subject matter
relates more appropriately to another committee, proposed amendments to the
Constitution of the State of Arkansas or the federal government United States
Government, election laws and procedures, federal and interstate relations,
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
legislative affairs, memorials, other matters whenever the subject matter is
not germane to the subject matter of any other standing committee, similar
legislation, and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the House
Committee on State Agencies, and Governmental Affairs. Transformation, and
Shared Services;
(ix) House Committee on City, County, Local Affairs,
Parks, Heritage, Tourism, and Game and Fish – matters pertaining to city and
municipal affairs, county affairs, local improvement districts, interlocal
government cooperation, parks, heritage, tourism, hunting, fishing, similar
legislation, and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the House
Committee on City, County, Local Affairs, Parks, Heritage, Tourism, and Game
and Fish; and
(x) House Committee on Energy, Environment, and
Arkansas Public Service Commission - matters pertaining to energy sources,
energy supplies, energy needs, energy problems, environmental affairs, water
and air pollution, natural resources, oil and gas, levees and drainage,
rivers and harbors, public utilities, similar legislation, and resolutions
germane to the House Committee on Energy, Environment, and Arkansas Public
Service Commission.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 2-16-203(b)(5), concerning penalties for a
violation of the Arkansas Plant Act of 1917, is amended to read as follows:
(5) All rules promulgated under this section shall be reviewed
by the House Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development and
the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development or
subcommittees of the House Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic
Development and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic
Development.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 2-16-605(b), concerning rules restricting
the pasturage of livestock, entry by persons, and location of honeybee
colonies, or other activities affecting the boll weevil eradication program,
is amended to read as follows:
(b) All rules promulgated under this subchapter shall be reviewed by
the House Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development and
the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development or
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
appropriate subcommittees of the House Committee on Agriculture, Forestry,
and Economic Development and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Forestry,
and Economic Development.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 2-18-105(b)(3), concerning fees of the
State Plant Board, is amended to read as follows:
(3) Before collecting the fees under this subsection or
increasing those fees hereafter, the board shall seek the advice of the House
Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development and the Senate
Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-10-122(c), concerning the requiring of
automated external defibrillators, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
provide a report to the following on or before July 1 each year regarding the
implementation of this section and the status of automated external
defibrillator availability on each school campus:
(1) The Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor
and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; and
(2) The Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment
to the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate on or before July
1 each year regarding the implementation of this section and the status of
automated external defibrillator availability on each school campus.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-11-208(a)(4), concerning the Regional
Educational Career Alternative School System for Adjudicated Youth, is
amended to read as follows:
(4) Beginning on October 1, 2011, the multiagency task force
shall provide status reports to the House Committee on Aging, Children and
Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and the Senate Interim Committee on
Children and Youth and the Speaker of the House of Representatives for
assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate one (1)
time each quarter.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2103(d)(2), concerning the duties of
the farm to school and early childhood education program coordinator, is
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
amended to read as follows:
(2) Submit the annual report to the House Committee on
Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development and to the Senate Committee
on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development and the Speaker of the
House of Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or
she deems appropriate.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 6-60-106(c)(2), concerning unplanned
pregnancies action plans, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The board shall report on the status of the action plan
annually to the:
(A) The Chair of the Senate Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor; and
(B) The Chair of the House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to
the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate;
(C) The Chair of the Senate Committee on Education; and
(D) The Chair of the House Committee on Education.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 6-60-111(d)(2), concerning sexual assault
action plans, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The board shall report on the status of the action plan annually
to the:
(A) The Chair of the Senate Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor; and
(B) The Chair of the House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to
the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate;
(C) The Chair of the Senate Committee on Education; and
(D) The Chair of the House Committee on Education.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 6-60-212(d), regarding nursing applicants
from medically underserved areas, is amended to read as follows:
(d) The coordinating board shall report annually to the House
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on
Public Health, Welfare, and Labor following regarding implementation of this
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
section:
(1) The Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor;
and
(2) The Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment
to the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 6-61-112(g)(2), concerning the calling of
a student or student's spouse into military service, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) The division shall report to the House Committee on Aging,
Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and the Senate Interim
Committee on Children and Youth and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems
appropriate regarding the type and amount of compensatory options provided
under this section by each state-supported institution of higher education no
later than October 1 of each year beginning in 2006 and each year thereafter.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 8-4-311(b)(11)(C), concerning the powers
of the Division of Environmental Quality, is amended to read as follows:
(C)(i) Any rule proposed pursuant to this authorization shall be
reported to the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and
Human Services and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor
or appropriate subcommittees of the House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor and Human Services and the Senate Committee on Public
Health, Welfare, and Labor prior to its final promulgation; and

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 8-5-207 is amended to read as follows:
8-5-207. Operators to be licensed.
(a) In order to safeguard the public health and protect the waters of
this state from pollution, all operators in responsible charge of public or
private wastewater treatment plants shall be duly licensed and certified as
competent by the Division of Environmental Quality under the provisions of
this subchapter and under such rules as the Arkansas Pollution Control and
Ecology Commission may adopt, with the advice and assistance of the licensing
committee, pursuant to the authority of this subchapter.
(b) All rules promulgated pursuant to under this subchapter shall be
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
reviewed by the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and
Human Services and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor
or appropriate subcommittees of the House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor and Human Services and the Senate Committee on Public
Health, Welfare, and Labor.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 8-6-221 is amended to read as follows:
8-6-221. Review of rules.
All rules adopted under this subchapter shall be reviewed by the House
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human Services and the
Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor or appropriate
subcommittees of the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and
Human Services and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 8-6-610(b), concerning rules of the
Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) The rules shall be reviewed by the House Committee on Public
Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human Services and the Senate Committee on
Public Health, Welfare, and Labor or appropriate subcommittees of the House
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human Services and the
Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 8-6-902(c), concerning rules promulgated
by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, is amended to read
as follows:
(c) All rules adopted under this subchapter shall be reviewed by the
House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human Services and
the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor or appropriate
subcommittees of the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and
Human Services and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 8-9-105(c), concerning rules promulgated
by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, is amended to read
as follows:
(c) All rules adopted under this chapter shall be reviewed by the House
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human Services and the
Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor or appropriate
subcommittees of the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and
Human Services and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 8-9-805(b), concerning hearings on the
technical and economic feasibility and commercial viability of the interim
storage and recycling of spent nuclear fuel, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The Legislative Council shall hold hearings on the technical and
economic feasibility and commercial viability of the interim storage and
recycling of spent nuclear fuel and include the following committees, the:
(1) House Committee on Insurance and Commerce, Insurance, Labor
and Licensing, and Public Transportation;
(2) Senate Committee on Insurance and Commerce;
(3) House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and
Human Services;
(4) Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; and
(5) Joint Energy Committee on Energy; and
(6) House Committee on Energy, Environment, and Arkansas Public
Service Commission.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 9-4-110 is amended to read as follows:
9-4-110. Reports.
The Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission or its
designee shall provide an annual report by October 1 of each year to the
Chair of the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth and the Chair of
the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military
Affairs Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the
committee or committees he or she deems appropriate containing the following
information:
(1) The incidence of domestic violence in this state based on
information obtained from shelters under this chapter;
(2) A description of shelters that meet the requirements of and
receive funding from the commission or its designee under this chapter; and
(3) The number of persons assisted by the shelters that receive
funding from the commission or its designee under this chapter.
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 9-5-113 is amended to read as follows:
9-5-113. Reports.
The Children's Advocacy Centers of Arkansas or its designee shall
provide an annual report by March 1 of each year to the Department of Human
Services, Division of Arkansas State Police, Chair of the Senate Interim
Committee on Children and Youth, and the Chair of the House Committee on
Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs Speaker of the
House of Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or
she deems appropriate containing the following information:
(1) The incidence of child abuse in this state based on
information obtained from child safety centers under this chapter;
(2) A description of child safety centers that meet the
requirements of the Department of Finance and Administration and the
Children's Advocacy Centers of Arkansas and receive funding from the
Department of Finance and Administration;
(3) The number of children receiving investigative services by
the child safety centers that receive funding from the Department of Finance
and Administration under this chapter; and
(4) Outcome data provided by the child safety centers.

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 9-6-110 is amended to read as follows:
9-6-110. Reports.
The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration or his or
her designee shall provide an annual report by October 1 of each year to the
Chair of the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth and the Chair of
the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military
Affairs Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the
committee or committees he or she deems appropriate containing the following
information:
(1) The incidence of domestic violence in this state based on
information obtained from shelters that receive funds under this chapter;
(2) A description of shelters that meet the requirements of and
receive funds under this chapter; and
(3) The number of persons assisted by the shelters that receive
funds under this chapter.

02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
SECTION 23. Arkansas Code § 9-15-407 is amended to read as follows:
9-15-407. Reporting.
The Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission shall report
annually to the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and
Military Affairs and the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth and
the Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the committee
or committees he or she deems appropriate regarding:
(1) The status of the implementation and administration of this
subchapter and its purposes; and
(2) Any recommended changes in the law to improve the prevention
of or intervention into spousal abuse situations.

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code § 9-25-105(b)(12), concerning the Child
Death and Near Fatality Multidisciplinary Review Committee, is amended to
read as follows:
(12) One (1) member appointed by the Chair of the Subcommittee on
Children and Youth of the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth,
Legislative and Military Affairs Public Health and Human Services;

SECTION 25. Arkansas Code § 9-28-205(f), concerning youth services
centers, is amended to read as follows:
(f) The Department of Human Services and the Division of Elementary
and Secondary Education shall report annually, beginning on March 1, 2010, to
the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military
Affairs and to the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth and the
Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the committee or
committees he or she deems appropriate on the state of the Division of Youth
Services' system of education.

SECTION 26. Arkansas Code § 9-28-216(b), concerning the separation of
juvenile offenders, is amended to read as follows:
(b) No rule pertaining to the separation of juvenile offenders
promulgated hereafter by the division shall be effective until reviewed by
the Legislative Council, the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth,
Legislative and Military Affairs Public Health and Human Services, and the
Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth, or appropriate subcommittees
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
thereof, of the General Assembly.

SECTION 27. Arkansas Code § 9-28-217(a)(19)(B)(iii), concerning
juvenile records confidentiality, is amended to read as follows:
(iii) The Department of Corrections shall submit the
rules to the following committees for review:
(a) Senate Interim Committee on Children and
Youth;
(b) House Committee on Aging, Children and
Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs Public Health and Human Services; and
(c) Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the
Legislative Council.

SECTION 28. Arkansas Code § 9-28-301(e)-(g), concerning inspections of
facilities operated by or under contract with the Division of Youth Services
of the Department of Human Services, are amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Health shall present a list
of findings of the random health inspections to the House Committee on Aging,
Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs Public Health and Human
Services and the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth within one
(1) month after completing the random health inspections.
(2)(A) In the event the General Assembly is in session, the
Secretary of the Department of Health shall provide the report to the House
Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs
Public Health and Human Services and the Chair of the Senate Interim
Committee on Children and Youth.
(B) The complete report, including, but not limited to,
statistics shall be made available to the public.
(f)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services or the
division shall file the report, along with a response not to exceed two (2)
pages, to the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and
Military Affairs Public Health and Human Services and the Senate Interim
Committee on Children and Youth within thirty (30) days after receiving an
inspection report prepared by the Department of Health.
(2) In the event the General Assembly is in session, the
Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall provide the response to
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military
Affairs Public Health and Human Services and the Chair of the Senate Interim
Committee on Children and Youth.
(3) The response shall include a plan of correction and suggest
a means by which the Department of Human Services or the division will
correct any deficiencies within thirty (30) days of the filing of the report
or within the time frame determined by the Department of Health to ensure the
health and safety of the juveniles housed at the facility.
(g)(1) The Department of Human Services or the division shall develop
an internal audit and review to evaluate and monitor all facilities of the
division.
(2) The Department of Health will cooperate in training or
assisting the Department of Human Services or the division in developing the
process as it relates to health concerns.
(3) Included in its quarterly performance reports, the
Department of Human Services or the division shall report on its progress to
the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military
Affairs Public Health and Human Services and the Senate Interim Committee on
Children and Youth.
(4) In the event the General Assembly is in session, the
Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall provide the report to the
House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military
Affairs Public Health and Human Services and the Chair of the Senate Interim
Committee on Children and Youth.

SECTION 29. Arkansas Code § 9-28-302(e)-(g), concerning security
inspections of facilities operated by or under contract with the Division of
Youth Services of the Department of Human Services, is amended to read as
follows:
(e)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections shall present a
list of findings of the random security inspections to the House Committee on
Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs Public Health and
Human Services and the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth within
one (1) month after conducting the random security inspections.
(2) In the event the General Assembly is in session, the
Secretary of the Department of Corrections shall provide the report to the
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military
Affairs Public Health and Human Services and the Chair of the Senate Interim
Committee on Children and Youth.
(3) The complete report including, but not limited to,
statistics shall be made available to the public.
(f)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services or the
division shall file the report, along with a response not to exceed two (2)
pages, to the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and
Military Affairs Public Health and Human Services and the Senate Interim
Committee on Children and Youth within thirty (30) days of receiving an
inspection report prepared by the Department of Corrections.
(2) In the event the General Assembly is in session, the
Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall provide the response to
the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military
Affairs Public Health and Human Services and the Chair of the Senate Interim
Committee on Children and Youth.
(3) The response shall include a plan of correction and suggest
a means by which the Department of Human Services or the division will
correct any deficiencies within thirty (30) days of the filing of the report
or within the time frame determined by the Department of Corrections to
ensure the health and safety of the juveniles housed at the facility.
(g)(1)(A) The Department of Human Services or the division shall
develop an internal audit and review to evaluate and monitor all facilities
of the division.
(B) The internal audit and review shall include without
limitation monitoring of all facilities for security concerns.
(2) The Department of Corrections will cooperate in training or
assisting the Department of Human Services or the division in developing this
process as it relates to security concerns.
(3)(A) In its quarterly performance reports, the Department of
Human Services or the division shall report on its progress to the House
Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs
Public Health and Human Services and the Senate Interim Committee on Children
and Youth.
(B) In the event the General Assembly is in session, the
Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall provide the report to the
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military
Affairs Public Health and Human Services and the Chair of the Senate Interim
Committee on Children and Youth.

SECTION 30. Arkansas Code § 9-28-405(m), concerning the Child Welfare
Agency Review Board, is amended to read as follows:
(m) All rules promulgated under this section and all public comment
received in writing by the department in response shall be made available for
review by the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth and the
Subcommittee on Children and Youth of the House Committee on Aging, Children
and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs Public Health and Human Services,
and by the Governor or his or her designee from among the Governor's staff.

SECTION 31. Arkansas Code § 9-28-603(b)(6), concerning the
establishment of independent living programs, is amended to read as follows:
(6) Provide an annual report to the division and the Senate
Interim Committee on Children and Youth and the Subcommittee on Children and
Youth of the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and
Military Affairs Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to
the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate summarizing outcome
data in areas related to educational achievement, employment, and criminal
justice contact of the participants and other information as requested by the
division.

SECTION 32. Arkansas Code § 9-30-105(c)(7), concerning the powers and
duties of the Department of Human Services, is amended to read as follows:
(7) On or before October 1 of each year, provide an annual
report to the Chair of the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth and
the Chair of the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative
and Military Affairs Public Health and Human Services summarizing the
evaluations of the One Percent to Prevent Fund.

SECTION 33. Arkansas Code § 10-2-133(d), concerning increased cost
obligations for health benefit plans, is amended to read as follows:
(d) A fiscal impact statement required by this section shall be
developed by an actuary within the guidelines adopted by the House Committee
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
on Insurance and Commerce, Insurance, Labor and Licensing, and Public
Transportation and the Senate Committee on Insurance and Commerce, as
applicable.

SECTION 34. Arkansas Code § 10-3-220(b), concerning the monitoring of
changes made in federal income tax laws and regulations, is amended to read
as follows:
(b) The secretary shall report his or her findings annually to the
House Committee on Revenue and Taxation and the Senate Committee on Revenue
and Taxation and the Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment
to the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate and may make such
other reports to the House Committee on Revenue and Taxation and the Senate
Committee on Revenue and Taxation committees under this subsection as he or
she deems necessary.

SECTION 35. Arkansas Code § 10-3-316 is amended to read as follows:
10-3-316. Charitable, Penal and Correctional Institutions Subcommittee.
The cochairs of the Legislative Council shall appoint a member of the
Senate Committee on City, County, and Local Affairs and a member of the House
Committee on City, County, and Local Affairs, Parks, Heritage, Tourism, and
Game and Fish to serve as members of the Charitable, Penal and Correctional
Institutions Subcommittee of the Legislative Council.

SECTION 36. Arkansas Code § 10-3-1401(a)(1)(D), concerning the
membership of the Joint Committee on Economic and Tax Policy, is amended to
read as follows:
(D) The Chair of the House Committee on Revenue and
Taxation Finance and Administration;

SECTION 37. Arkansas Code § 10-3-3202(b)(1)(M)-(P), concerning the
Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee, are amended to read as
follows:
(M)(i) The Chair of the House Committee on Aging, Children
and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs Public Health and Human Services
or his or her designee.
(ii) The Chair of the House Committee on Aging,
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs Public Health and Human
Services shall be a nonvoting ex officio member of the Child Maltreatment
Investigations Oversight Committee if he or she appoints a designee under
subdivision (b)(1)(M)(i) of this section;
(N)(i) The Chair of the Senate Interim Committee on
Children and Youth or his or her designee.
(ii) The Chair of the Senate Interim Committee on
Children and Youth shall be a nonvoting ex officio member of the Child
Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee if he or she appoints a
designee under subdivision (b)(1)(N)(i) of this section;
(O) Two (2) members of the General Assembly who are members
of the:
(i) House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth,
Legislative and Military Affairs Public Health and Human Services; or
(ii) Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth;
(P)(i) One (1) current or former member of the General
Assembly who is a current or former member of the:
(a) House Committee on Aging, Children and
Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs Public Health and Human Services; or
(b) Senate Interim Committee on Children and
Youth.
(ii) The current or former member of the General
Assembly under subdivision (b)(1)(P)(i) of this section shall be appointed by
the Governor;

SECTION 38. Arkansas Code § 10-3-3204(a), concerning reports to the
Child Maltreatment Investigation Oversight Committee, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) The Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee shall
submit its findings and recommendations contained in a report at least
annually to the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and
Military Affairs and the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth and
the Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the committee
or committees he or she deems appropriate.

SECTION 39. Arkansas Code § 12-8-504(c), concerning the transfer of
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
child abuse investigations, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The Department of Human Services and the Department Division of
Arkansas State Police shall submit for review any transition plan developed
under this section to the House Subcommittee on Children and Youth of the
House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military
Affairs and the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth and the
Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the committee or
committees he or she deems appropriate.

SECTION 40. Arkansas Code § 12-8-509(a)(2)(A), concerning reporting on
findings and statistics regarding incidents of neglect, is amended to read as
follows:
(2)(A) Annually report no later than October 1 to the following:
(i) The Senate Interim Committee on Children and
Youth;
(ii) The House Committee on Aging, Children and
Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs;
(iii)(ii) The Senate Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor; and
(iv)(iii) The House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to
the committee or committees that he or she deems appropriate.

SECTION 41. Arkansas Code § 12-9-104(1)(B), concerning rules of the
Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training, is amended to
read as follows:
(B) The rules promulgated by the commission shall not go into
full force and effect until the commission seeks the advice of the
Legislative Council and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor and Human Services and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare,
and Labor or appropriate subcommittees of the Legislative Council and the
House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human Services and
the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor;

SECTION 42. Arkansas Code § 12-12-407(g), concerning the audit of
untested sexual assault collection kits and unsubmitted anonymous kits, is
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
amended to read as follows:
(g)(1) On or before each February 1, the State Crime Laboratory shall
prepare and transmit to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker
of the House of Representatives, the Senate Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor, the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor
and Human Services, and the Attorney General a report containing:
(A) A compilation of the data submitted by law enforcement
agencies and licensed healthcare providers under this section, with the data
reported in the aggregate; and
(B) A plan to address any backlog of untested sexual
assault collection kits and unsubmitted anonymous kits.
(2) The report submitted under subdivision (g)(1) of this
section shall be presented to the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare,
and Labor and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and
Human Services, meeting jointly.

SECTION 43. Arkansas Code § 12-12-913(c)(3), concerning guidelines and
procedures promulgated by the Sex Offender Assessment Committee, is amended
to read as follows:
(3) The Sex Offender Assessment Committee shall submit the
proposed guidelines and procedures to the House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor and Human Services and the Senate Committee on Public
Health, Welfare, and Labor for their review and shall report to the House
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human Services and the
Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor every six (6) months on
the implementation of this section.

SECTION 44. Arkansas Code § 12-18-713 is amended to read as follows:
12-18-713. Reports on overturned true determinations.
(a)(1) The Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas
State Police shall submit two (2) reports annually on true determinations
made under this chapter that are administratively or judicially overturned to
the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth and the House Committee on
Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs Speaker of the
House of Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or
she deems appropriate.
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
(2) The first report shall be submitted on June 1 and the second
report shall be submitted on December 1.
(b) A report submitted under subsection (a) of this section shall
include:
(1) Data on overturned true determinations by county; and
(2) Any other information requested by the Senate Interim
Committee on Children and Youth and the House Committee on Aging, Children
and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs committees under subdivision
(a)(1) of this section.

SECTION 45. Arkansas Code § 12-18-801(a)(2), concerning the time to
complete an administrative hearing related to child maltreatment is amended
to read as follows:
(2)(A) The Department of Human Services shall report any
failures to comply with this subsection for each quarter to the House
Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and
the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth and the Speaker of the
House of Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or
she deems appropriate.
(B) The quarterly report to the House Committee on Aging,
Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and the Senate Interim
Committee on Children and Youth under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section
shall include a written explanation of the failure of the Department of Human
Services.

SECTION 46. Arkansas Code § 12-18-908(f), concerning the removal of
names from the Child Maltreatment Central Registry, is amended to read as
follows:
(f) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall adopt
rules necessary to carry out this chapter pursuant to the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., except that the secretary
shall not begin the process under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act,
§ 25-15-201 et seq., until the proposed rules have been reviewed by the House
Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs
Public Health and Human Services and the Senate Interim Committee on Children
and Youth.
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
SECTION 47. Arkansas Code § 12-27-113(e)(5)(B), concerning commitments
to the Division of Correction, is amended to read as follows:
(B) A view of records under this subdivision (e)(5) by an
employee may be performed only if the employee is assigned to one (1) or more
of the following committees:
(i) Senate Committee on Judiciary;
(ii) House Committee on Judiciary Public Safety,
Corrections, and Inspector General; or
(iii) Charitable, Penal, and Correctional
Institutions Subcommittee of the Legislative Council.

SECTION 48. Arkansas Code § 12-27-129(a), concerning the Division of
Correction's report on rehabilitation, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Division of Correction may report to the House Committee on
State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the Senate Committee on State
Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems
appropriate no later than December 1 of each year regarding its efforts in
rehabilitating the inmate population.

SECTION 49. Arkansas Code § 12-75-132(f)(3), concerning the Arkansas
Homeland Security Advisory Group, is amended to read as follows:
(3) The advisory group shall submit the report annually to the
director, and to the House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental
Affairs and the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs,
and the Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the
committee or committees he or she deems appropriate.

SECTION 50. Arkansas Code § 13-11-102 is amended to read as follows:
13-11-102. Administration — Rules.
(a) The Senior Arkansans Hall of Fame shall be administered by the
Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of
Human Services, in consultation with the House Committee on Aging, Children
and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs Public Health and Human Services.
(b) The division will promulgate rules to implement the hall of fame
and to select candidates for inclusion.
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
SECTION 51. Arkansas Code § 14-236-107(b)(1), concerning rules
promulgated by the Division of Environmental Health Protection of the
Department of Health, is amended to read as follows:
(1) After review by the House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor and Human Services and the Senate Committee on Public
Health, Welfare, and Labor or appropriate subcommittees thereof adopt, and
from time to time amend, rules governing the review and approval of
subdivisions proposing to utilize individual sewage disposal systems as the
means of sewage disposal for part or all of the lots in the subdivision and
the location, design, construction, installation, and operation of individual
sewage disposal systems proposed for or located in subdivisions or in platted
or unplatted lots or tracts of land pursuant to the procedures provided in
the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., in order that
the wastes from the systems will not pollute any potable water supply, or
source of water used for public or domestic supply purposes, or for
recreational purposes, or other waters of this state, and will not give rise
to a public health hazard by being accessible to insects, rodents, or other
possible carriers which may come into contact with food or potable water, or
by being accessible to human beings, and will not constitute a nuisance due
to odor or unsightly appearance;

SECTION 52. Arkansas Code § 14-262-101(b)(4), concerning the review of
rules concerning the transfer of unexpended funds relative to the collection
of certain fines, is amended to read as follows:
(4) All rules promulgated pursuant to this subsection shall be
reviewed by the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and
Human Services and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor
or appropriate subcommittees thereof.

SECTION 53. Arkansas Code § 15-4-1405(a), concerning the Center for
Prototype Development and Emerging Technologies, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) The Center for Prototype Development and Emerging Technologies
shall submit an annual report based on the fiscal year on or before December
31 of each year to the Governor and shall file an electronic copy of the
report with the Legislative Council to be reviewed by the House Committee on
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
State Agencies, and Governmental Affairs Transformation, and Shared Services
and the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs.

SECTION 54. Arkansas Code § 15-4-3805(b)(2), concerning reporting
requirements of the Department of Agriculture, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Make the report required under this subsection available to
the Governor and the cochairs of the Legislative Council or, if the General
Assembly is in session, the cochairs of the Joint Budget Committee, the House
Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development, and the Senate
Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development, and the Speaker
of the House of Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees
he or she deems appropriate.

SECTION 55. Arkansas Code § 15-5-1408(2)(B), concerning reporting
under the Venture Capital Investment Act of 2001, is amended to read as
follows:
(B) House Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic
Development and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic
Development and the Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to
the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate; and

SECTION 56. Arkansas Code § 15-5-1415(2)(B), concerning reporting
under the Venture Capital Investment Act of 2001, is amended to read as
follows:
(B) House Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development
Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the committee or
committees he or she deems appropriate;

SECTION 57. Arkansas Code § 15-10-207 is amended to read as follows:
15-10-207. Reporting regarding the Weatherization Assistance Program.
The Arkansas Energy Office of the Division of Environmental Quality
shall report to the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor
Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the committee he or
she deems appropriate and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor concerning the Weatherization Assistance Program as transferred to the
office under § 25-14-103 20-80-312 and as authorized under § 15-10-205(a):
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
(1) When the office applies to the United States Department of
Energy for the funding for the program as described in the state plan;
(2) At the midyear point of the program to show the statistics
relating to budgeting, enrollment, and other information relating to the
program; and
(3) At the end of the year of the program to show the total
impact of the program and to discuss the renewal application for the funding
for the program as described in the state plan.

SECTION 58. Arkansas Code § 15-22-301(12), concerning the duties of
the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission, is amended to read as follows:
(12) Report periodically to the House Committee on Agriculture,
Forestry, and Economic Development and the Senate Committee on Agriculture,
Forestry, and Economic Development and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems
appropriate;

SECTION 59. Arkansas Code § 15-23-904(b), concerning the authority of
the Arkansas Waterways Commission to establish programs, is amended to read
as follows:
(b) The rules shall be reviewed by the House Committee on Commerce,
Insurance, Labor and Licensing, and Public Transportation and the Senate
Committee on Public Transportation, Technology, and Legislative Affairs.

SECTION 60. Arkansas Code § 16-17-1002(b)(1)(B), concerning the
District Court Resource Assessment Board, is amended to read as follows:
(B) Two (2) members of the House of Representatives
appointed by the Chair of the House Committee on Judiciary Public Safety,
Corrections, and Inspector General; and

SECTION 61. Arkansas Code § 16-17-1002(b)(2)(B), concerning the
District Court Resource Assessment Board, is amended to read as follows:
(B) The Chair of the House Committee on Judiciary Public
Safety, Corrections, and Inspector General or his or her designee; and

SECTION 62. Arkansas Code § 16-87-216(c)(13)(B)(ii), concerning the
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
Juvenile Ombudsman Division of the Arkansas Public Defender Commission, is
amended to read as follows:
(ii) The House Committee on Aging, Children and
Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs Speaker of the House of
Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems
appropriate;

SECTION 63. Arkansas Code § 16-90-802(b)(2)(B), concerning the
Arkansas Sentencing Commission, is amended to read as follows:
(B) One (1) advisory member shall be appointed by and
serve at the pleasure of the Chair of the House Committee on Judiciary Public
Safety, Corrections, and Inspector General.

SECTION 64. Arkansas Code § 16-90-802(d)(2)(E), concerning the
Arkansas Sentencing Commission, is amended to read as follows:
(E) Before review and approval by the Legislative Council
under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.,
revisions to the voluntary sentencing standards shall be reviewed by the
House Committee on Judiciary Public Safety, Corrections, and Inspector
General and the Senate Committee on Judiciary;

SECTION 65. Arkansas Code § 16-93-202(e)(2), concerning the review of
records of the Post-Prison Transfer Board, is amended to read as follows:
(2) A view of records under subdivision (e)(1) of this section by
an employee may be performed only if the employee is assigned to one (1) or
more of the following committees:
(A) Senate Committee on Judiciary;
(B) House Committee on Judiciary Public Safety,
Corrections, and Inspector General; or
(C) Charitable, Penal and Correctional Institutions
Subcommittee of the Legislative Council.

SECTION 66. Arkansas Code § 16-93-210(a)(1), concerning the monthly
performance report on parole and post-release supervision applications and
outcome, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The Post-Prison Transfer Board shall submit a monthly report to
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
the chairs chair of the House Committee on Judiciary and the Senate Committee
on Judiciary, the Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to
the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate, the Legislative
Council, the Board of Corrections, and the Governor, showing the number of
persons who make application for parole or post-release supervision and those
who are granted or denied parole or post-release supervision during the
previous month for each criminal offense classification.

SECTION 67. Arkansas Code § 16-99-105(c), concerning reporting and
data collection, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The board shall report all data, findings, and recommendations
annually for improvement to the:
(1) Governor;
(2) Chief Justice of the Supreme Court;
(3) Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts;
(4) Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the
committee or committees he or she deems appropriate;
(5) President of the Senate;
(6) Chair of the House Committee on Judiciary; and
(7)(6) Chair of the Senate Committee on Judiciary.

SECTION 68. Arkansas Code § 17-4-110(4), concerning responsibilities
of occupational licensing entities, is amended to read as follows:
(4) Provide to the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth,
Legislative and Military Affairs Speaker of the House of Representatives for
assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate an
annual report stating the number of individuals granted automatic
occupational licensure and expedited occupational licensure under this
chapter.

SECTION 69. Arkansas Code § 17-11-404(c)(1), concerning investigations
of the State Board of Appraisers, Abstractors, and Home Inspectors, is
amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) The board shall file a report annually on or before December 1
with the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the
House Committee on State Agencies, and Governmental Affairs Transformation,
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
and Shared Services for the Senate Committee on State Agencies and
Governmental Affairs' and the House Committee on State Agencies and
Governmental Affairs' committees' review.

SECTION 70. Arkansas Code § 17-38-102(g), concerning rules promulgated
by the Department of Health, is amended to read as follows:
(g) All rules promulgated pursuant to this section shall be reviewed
by the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human
Services and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor or
appropriate subcommittees thereof.

SECTION 71. Arkansas Code § 17-51-103(b), concerning rules pertaining
to waterworks operators, is amended to read as follows:
(b) All rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter shall be reviewed
by the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human
Services and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor or
appropriate subcommittees thereof.

SECTION 72. Arkansas Code § 17-87-203(1)(B), concerning rules
promulgated by the Arkansas State Board of Nursing, is amended to read as
follows:
(B) No rule promulgated hereafter by the board shall be
effective until reviewed by the Legislative Council and the House Committee
on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human Services and the Senate
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor or appropriate subcommittees
thereof;

SECTION 73. Arkansas Code § 17-87-209(e), concerning reports on the
Clinical Nurse Education Portal, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) On the year-anniversary of August 1, 2023, and annually
thereafter, the department shall report on the implementation, progress, and
activity of the portal to the:
(A) Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor;
and
(B) House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor
Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the committee or
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
committees he or she deems appropriate.
(2) The Chair of the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare,
and Labor or the Chair of the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor Speaker of the House of Representatives may request any additional
reports at his or her discretion.

SECTION 74. Arkansas Code § 17-87-314(e)(5), concerning reports by the
Full Independent Practice Credentialing Committee, is amended to read as
follows:
(5) Provide reports quarterly and upon request regarding the number
of applicants approved and denied to the Senate Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the committee
or committees he or she deems appropriate.

SECTION 75. Arkansas Code § 17-100-202(b)(3)(A), concerning rules
promulgated by the Board of Examiners in Speech-Language Pathology and
Audiology, is amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) All rules promulgated pursuant to this section shall be
reviewed by the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and
Human Services and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor
or appropriate subcommittees thereof.

SECTION 76. Arkansas Code § 17-100-208(c)(1), concerning the use of
outside investigators by the Board of Examiners in Speech-Language Pathology
and Audiology, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) The board shall file a report annually on or before December 1
with the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the
House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human Services for
the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the House
Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs' committees' review.

SECTION 77. Arkansas Code § 17-102-201(a)(5), concerning the Arkansas
State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques, is amended to read as
follows:
(5)(A) On a biennial basis beginning in October 2010, the board
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
shall file a written report with the House Committee on Public Heath,
Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor and the Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the
committee or committees he or she deems appropriate.
(B) The report shall contain a certified copy of the
minutes of all board meetings as required by § 17-102-205 for the calendar
years 2009 through October 2010 and thereafter covering the period of time
since the last report.
(C) The report shall contain a comprehensive assessment of
the board's functionality, including without limitation staff and office site
adequacy and any other information as may be requested by the House Committee
on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public
Health, Welfare, and Labor and the committee or committees to which the
report is assigned by the Speaker of the House of Representatives sufficient
for the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor committees to make a
recommendation to the Governor regarding whether the board should be
continued or whether the board should be disbanded and abolished in
accordance with a proclamation issued by the Governor.

SECTION 78. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1151(g)(1), concerning the University
of Arkansas for Medical Sciences National Cancer Institute Designation Trust
Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(g)(1) The Winthrop P. Rockefeller Cancer Institute at the University
of Arkansas for Medical Sciences shall submit a semiannual report containing
the following information to the Governor; the Legislative Council or, if the
General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee; the Senate
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; and the House Committee on
Public Health, Welfare, and Labor Speaker of the House of Representatives for
assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate:
(A) The balance of the fund as of the reporting date;
(B) A list of the administrative costs paid for from the
fund, including without limitation salaries, pensions, and packages;
(C) The total revenue received by the fund during the
reporting period; and
(D) A detailed description of the steps taken and the
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
progress made toward achieving status as a National Cancer Institute-
Designated Cancer Center during the reporting period.

SECTION 79. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1160(h)(1), concerning the University
of Arkansas for Medical Sciences Maternal Health Workforce Trust Fund, is
amended to read as follows:
(h)(1) The University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences shall submit a
semiannual report containing the following information to the Governor; the
Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint
Budget Committee; the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor;
and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor Speaker of the
House of Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or
she deems appropriate:
(A) The balance of the fund as of the reporting date;
(B) A list of the administrative costs paid for from the
fund, including without limitation salaries, pensions, and packages;
(C) The total revenue received by the fund during the
reporting period; and
(D) A detailed description of the steps taken and the
progress made toward addressing the maternal health workforce needs of
Arkansas during the reporting period.

SECTION 80. Arkansas Code § 19-11-261(b), concerning the cooperative
purchase of paper products for local government, is amended to read as
follows:
(b)(1) The director shall promulgate rules for administration of the
program.
(2) The rules shall be reviewed by the House Committee on Public
Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human Services and the Senate Committee on
Public Health, Welfare, and Labor or appropriate subcommittees of the
committees.

SECTION 81. Arkansas Code § 19-11-1404(c), concerning the Construction
Manager-General Contractor Method of Procurement Pilot Program, is amended to
read as follows:
(c) The Director of State Highways and Transportation shall send
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
written notice identifying the transportation project and the reasons for
deciding to apply the construction manager-general contractor method to that
specific transportation project to:
(1) The Chair of the House Committee on Commerce, Insurance,
Labor and Licensing, and Public Transportation; and
(2) The Chair of the Senate Committee on Public Transportation,
Technology, and Legislative Affairs.

SECTION 82. Arkansas Code § 19-12-117(g)(3), concerning the
establishment of the Arkansas Tobacco Settlement Commission and resulting
from Initiated Act 1 of 2000, is amended to read as follows:
(3) The commission shall file a quarterly progress report with the
House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee
on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems
appropriate.

SECTION 83. Arkansas Code § 20-2-103, concerning the powers and duties
of the Arkansas Minority Health Commission, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The commission shall report two (2) times each year to the House
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on
Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems
appropriate.

SECTION 84. Arkansas Code § 20-2-106 is amended to read as follows:
20-2-106. Report on health disparities.
On or before October 1 each year, the Arkansas Minority Health
Commission shall report to the Secretary of the Department of Health, the
Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate, the Chair of the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor, and the Chair of the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the
committee or committees he or she deems appropriate without limitation:
(1) Summarizing the previous year's work under § 20-2-103(a)(5)
and (6);
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
(2) Describing reductions in disparities in health and health
care in this state; and
(3) Outlining plans for continuing and expanding in the coming
year the program to reduce disparities in health and health care in this
state.

SECTION 85. Arkansas Code § 20-6-409(a)(2), concerning informational
materials prepared by the Department of Health and the Department of Human
Services, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The Department of Health and the Department of Human
Services shall present informational materials regarding this subchapter to
the:
(A) Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor;
and
(B) House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor
Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the committee or
committees he or she deems appropriate; and
(C) House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth,
Legislative and Military Affairs.

SECTION 86. Arkansas Code § 20-7-101(b)(4), concerning violations of
the policies of the State Board of Health, is amended to read as follows:
(4) All rules promulgated pursuant to this subsection shall be
reviewed by the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and
Human Services and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor
or appropriate subcommittees thereof.

SECTION 87. Arkansas Code § 20-7-109(a)(2), concerning the authority
of the State Board of Health to regulate public health, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) All rules promulgated pursuant to this subsection shall be
reviewed by the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and
Human Services and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor
or appropriate subcommittees thereof.

SECTION 88. Arkansas Code § 20-7-135(f)(1), concerning nutrition and
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
physical activity standards, is amended to read as follows:
(f)(1) The division and the department shall report annually on
progress in implementing nutrition and physical education standards to the:
(A) Chair of the House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to
the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate;
(B) Chair of the Senate Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor;
(C) Chair of the House Committee on Education; and
(D) Chair of the Senate Committee on Education.

SECTION 89. Arkansas Code § 20-7-306 is amended to read as follows:
20-7-306. Reports — Assistance.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Health shall prepare and submit
a biennial report to the Governor, and the House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor or appropriate subcommittees thereof, and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives for assignment to the committee, committees, subcommittee, or
subcommittees that he or she deems appropriate.
(b) The Department of Health shall provide assistance to the House
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on
Public Health, Welfare, and Labor or appropriate subcommittees thereof
committees or subcommittees under subsection (a) of this section in the
development of information necessary in the examination of healthcare issues.
(c)(1) With regard to § 6-18-702(d), § 6-60-504(b), and § 20-78-
206(a)(2)(B), the department shall report every six (6) months to the House
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on
Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems
appropriate regarding:
(A) The geographic patterns of exemptions, vaccination
rates, and exemptions in those areas as well as the rest of the state; and
(B) Disease incidence of vaccine-preventable diseases
collected by the department.
(2) The collection of exemption information shall begin January
4, 2004.
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
(3) Reports shall begin at the first interim meeting of the
House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee
on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor committees under subdivision (c)(1) of
this section.

SECTION 90. Arkansas Code § 20-8-110(h), concerning the collection and
dissemination of health data, is amended to read as follows:
(h)(1) With the advice of the commission, the director shall compile
and publish summaries of health data collected by the Health Services Permit
Agency.
(2)(A) The director shall prepare an annual report of the Health
Services Permit Agency's findings and submit the report to the secretary, the
General Assembly, and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor or
appropriate subcommittees thereof, and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives for assignment to the committee, committees, subcommittee, or
subcommittees that he or she deems appropriate.
(B) The Health Services Permit Agency shall provide
assistance to the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and
the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor committees or
subcommittees under subdivision (h)(2)(A) of this section in the development
of information necessary in the examination of healthcare issues.

SECTION 91. Arkansas Code § 20-8-807(a), concerning reports of the
Department of Health, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Annually, the Department of Health shall report to:
(1) The President Pro Tempore of the Senate;
(2) The Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment
to the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate;
(3) The minority leaders of the Senate and the House of
Representatives; and
(4) The Chair of the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare,
and Labor; and
(5) The Chair of the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare,
and Labor.

02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
SECTION 92. Arkansas Code § 20-9-1205(a)(1)(A), concerning reports
regarding healthcare-associated infections, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) In consultation with the Advisory Committee on Healthcare
Acquired Infections, the Department of Health shall submit annually a report
summarizing the health facility quarterly reports required under this
subchapter to the Chair of the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor and the Chair of the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor and the Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the
committee or committees he or she deems appropriate.

SECTION 93. Arkansas Code § 20-9-1402(c)(2), concerning the
establishment of the shaken baby syndrome education program, is amended to
read as follows:
(2) The department shall submit a biennial report of the
assessment under subdivision (c)(1) of this section to the Chair of the House
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Chair of the Senate
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Speaker of the House
of Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or she
deems appropriate.

SECTION 94. Arkansas Code § 20-10-113(b), concerning the Fair
Reimbursement and Assisted Living Cost Reporting Act of 2023, is amended to
read as follows:
(b) The Department of Human Services shall annually report to:
(1) The House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor
Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the committee or
committees he or she deems appropriate;
(2) The Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor;
and
(3) The Legislative Council.

SECTION 95. Arkansas Code § 20-10-501(1), concerning the definition of
"committees" as pertaining to long-term care networks, is amended to read as
follows:
(1) “Committees” means the House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor and Human Services and the Senate Committee on Public
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
Health, Welfare, and Labor or appropriate subcommittees thereof to whom the
state agencies in the long-term care network will report the progress of this
effort;

SECTION 96. Arkansas Code § 20-13-208 is amended to read as follows:
20-13-208. State Board of Health — Powers and duties.
(a)(1) The State Board of Health shall have the responsibility and
authority to hold public hearings and promulgate and implement rules and
standards which it deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this
subchapter.
(2) However, before implementing any rules or standards, the
board shall submit and obtain the review of the House Committee on Public
Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human Services and the Senate Committee on
Public Health, Welfare, and Labor or appropriate subcommittees.
(b) In addition, the board may establish appropriate rules and
standards defining or limiting the emergency medical procedures or services
that may be rendered by licensed emergency medical services personnel who are
authorized to legally perform these services under the conditions set forth
by the board, except that before implementing any rules and standards, the
board shall submit and obtain the review of the House Committee on Public
Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human Services and the Senate Committee on
Public Health, Welfare, and Labor or appropriate subcommittees.

SECTION 97. Arkansas Code § 20-13-210(a), concerning rules and
standards relating to emergency medical services, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) All rules and standards relating to emergency medical services
promulgated and adopted by the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council
and the State Board of Health or any other state agency or department
authorized to promulgate and adopt rules to carry out this subchapter shall
be submitted to the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and
Human Services and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor
or appropriate subcommittees thereof for consideration before being placed in
effect by the department or agency.
(2) No rules or standards promulgated to carry out this
subchapter shall be enforced by any state agency or department until they
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
have been:
(A) Submitted to and considered by the House Committee on
Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human Services and the Senate Committee
on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; and
(B) Reviewed and approved by the Legislative Council under
§ 10-3-309.

SECTION 98. Arkansas Code § 20-13-820 is amended to read as follows:
20-13-820. Reports to the General Assembly.
The Secretary of the Department of Health shall provide a report to the
Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the House Committee
on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor on or before April 1 and October 1 of
each year through 2011. After 2011, the secretary shall provide an annual
report to the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the
House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor Speaker of the House of
Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems
appropriate on or before October 1.

SECTION 99. Arkansas Code § 20-15-1503(h)(3), concerning the Universal
Newborn Hearing Screening, Tracking, and Intervention Advisory Board, is
amended to read as follows:
(3) The board shall complete an annual report for the House
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on
Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems
appropriate which provides information such as, but not limited to, the
number of hospitals in compliance with this subchapter, the number of Deaf,
deaf, or Hard of Hearing infants identified, and the availability of follow-
up services.

SECTION 100. Arkansas Code § 20-15-2307(a), concerning reporting by
the Maternal Mortality Review Committee, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Beginning in 2020, the Maternal Mortality Review Committee shall
file a written report on the number and causes of maternal deaths and its
recommendations on or before December 31 of each year to:
(1) The Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor;
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
(2) The House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor
Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the committee or
committees he or she deems appropriate; and
(3) The Legislative Council.

SECTION 101. Arkansas Code § 20-15-2407(a), concerning reporting by
the Maternal and Perinatal Outcomes Quality Review Committee, is amended to
read as follows:
(a) Beginning in 2020, the Maternal and Perinatal Outcomes Quality
Review Committee shall file a written report on maternal and perinatal
outcomes and its recommendations on or before December 31 of each year to:
(1) The Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor;
(2) The House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor
Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the committee or
committees he or she deems appropriate; and
(3) The Legislative Council.

SECTION 102. Arkansas Code § 20-16-203(c)(9), concerning the
membership of the advisory commission for the Arkansas Reproductive Health
Monitoring System, is amended to read as follows:
(9) One (1) member from the House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor and Human Services and one (1) member from the Senate
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; and

SECTION 103. Arkansas Code § 20-16-607(d), concerning pregnant women
in the custody or guardianship of the state, is amended to read as follows:
(d) A state agency under this section shall report annually to the
Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the House Committee
on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor Speaker of the House of Representatives
for assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate the
number of any terminations of pregnancies that occurred for women in the
custody or guardianship of the state agency.

SECTION 104. Arkansas Code § 20-18-202 is amended to read as follows:
20-18-202. Regulatory powers of the State Board of Health.
The State Board of Health may adopt, amend, and repeal rules for the
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
purpose of carrying out this chapter. All rules adopted under this chapter
shall be reviewed by the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor
and Human Services and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor or appropriate subcommittees of the House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor and Human Services and the Senate Committee on Public
Health, Welfare, and Labor.

SECTION 105. Arkansas Code § 20-27-1707(a)(2), concerning the Arkansas
Child Death Review Panel, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The Legislative Council shall forward the report to the
Senate Committee on Children and Youth and the House Committee on Aging,
Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs Speaker of the House of
Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems
appropriate.

SECTION 106. Arkansas Code § 20-32-106(c), concerning rules of the
Department of Health on the segregation, packaging, storage, transportation,
treatment, and disposal of commercial medical waste from healthcare-related
facilities, is amended to read as follows:
(c) All rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter shall be reviewed
by the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human
Services and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor or
appropriate subcommittees thereof.

SECTION 107. Arkansas Code § 20-46-105(a)(1), concerning the report
concerning emotionally disturbed youth, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The Department of Human Services shall report monthly to the
House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military
Affairs and the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth or appropriate
subcommittees thereof and the Speaker of the House of Representatives for
assignment to the committee, committees, subcommittee, or subcommittees he or
she deems appropriate the number of children placed in residential and
inpatient treatment programs, including sexual offender treatment, when
Medicaid is the payment source.

SECTION 108. Arkansas Code § 20-46-106(a)(3), concerning emotionally
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
disturbed youth treated out of state, is amended to read as follows:
(3) The department shall provide a report monthly to the Senate
Committee on Children and Youth and the House Committee on Aging, Children
and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs Speaker of the House of
Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems
appropriate reflecting the number of youths in the custody of the department
receiving services out of state as follows:
(A) The total number of males and the total number of females
currently in inpatient psychiatric programs, excluding sexual offender
treatment programs; and
(B) The total number of males and the total number of females
currently in inpatient psychiatric programs, including sexual offender
treatment programs.

SECTION 109. Arkansas Code § 20-47-505(b)(8), concerning the Child and
Adolescent Service System Program Coordinating Council, is amended to read as
follows:
(8) Provide a written report on a quarterly basis to the House
Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and
the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth and the Speaker of the
House of Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or
she deems appropriate that summarizes progress implementing this subchapter;

SECTION 110. Arkansas Code § 20-47-510(d)(1)(B), concerning the
coordination and oversight of the Comprehensive Children's Behavioral Health
System of Care Plan, is amended to read as follows:
(B) The House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth,
Legislative and Military Affairs and the Senate Interim Committee on Children
and Youth and the Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to
the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate.

SECTION 111. Arkansas Code § 20-47-510(e)(1)(B), concerning the
coordination and oversight of the Comprehensive Children's Behavioral Health
System of Care Plan, is amended to read as follows:
(B) The House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth,
Legislative and Military Affairs and the Senate Interim Committee on Children
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
and Youth and the Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to
the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate.

SECTION 112. Arkansas Code § 20-47-708 is amended to read as follows:
20-47-708. Annual report.
The Department of Human Services shall report annually on progress to
the:
(1) Governor;
(2) House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative
and Military Affairs and the Senate Committee on Children and Youth; and
(3) House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the
Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; and
(4) Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to
the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate.

SECTION 113. Arkansas Code § 20-48-702(a)(3), concerning the
reimbursement rate structure for individuals with developmental disabilities,
is amended to read as follows:
(3) There shall be a quarterly progress report to the House
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on
Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems
appropriate by the department on the categories of services and respective
service limits, service eligibility guidelines for each service component,
and the rate structure based on prospective costs.

SECTION 114. Arkansas Code § 20-57-104 is amended to read as follows:
20-57-104. Food safety — Definition.
(a) Employees of food service establishments shall keep their hands
and exposed portions of their arms clean in a manner approved by the
Department of Health.
(b)(1) Except when washing fruits and vegetables, employees of food
service establishments shall avoid contact of exposed ready-to-eat food with
their hands by use of suitable utensils such as deli tissue, spatulas, tongs,
or single-use gloves, or they shall wash their hands and exposed portions of
their arms utilizing a hand-washing program approved by the department.
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
(2) Employees shall minimize bare-hand and bare-arm contact with
exposed food that is not in a ready-to-eat form.
(c)(1) Within thirty (30) days of August 13, 2001, the department
shall initiate a full review of the current version of the United States Food
and Drug Administration Food Code.
(2) The department shall report its findings to the House
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on
Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.
(d)(c) As used in this section, “food service establishment” means
any:
(1) Fixed or mobile restaurant, coffee shop, cafeteria, short-
order cafe, luncheonette, grille, tearoom, soda fountain, sandwich shop,
hotel kitchen, smorgasbord, tavern, bar, cocktail lounge, night club,
roadside stand, industrial feeding establishment, school lunch project,
private, public, or nonprofit organization or institution routinely serving
the public, catering kitchen, commissary, or similar place in which the food
or drink is prepared for sale or for service on the premises or elsewhere;
(2) Grocery store, delicatessen, meat market, retail bakery, or
other establishment which sells or otherwise provides food for immediate or
on-premise consumption, regardless of whether serving food for immediate
consumption is the primary activity of the business; and
(3) Other eating and drinking establishment where food is served
or provided for the public with or without charge.

SECTION 115. Arkansas Code § 20-60-217 is amended to read as follows:
20-60-217. Reporting.
Annually, the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture shall submit a
report on the operations, implementation, and administration of the State
Meat Inspection Program to the:
(1) Governor;
(2) Chair of the House Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and
Economic Development Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment
to the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate; and
(3) Chair of the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and
Economic Development.

02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
SECTION 116. Arkansas Code § 20-76-106(c) and (d), concerning the
statewide implementation plan for Transitional Employment Assistance, is
amended to read as follows:
(c)(1)(A) The department shall prepare a comprehensive annual program
report.
(B) The report shall be subject to review and
recommendation by the board.
(2) The department shall submit the comprehensive annual program
report to the Governor, the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor and Human Services, and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare,
and Labor.
(3) The comprehensive annual program report shall contain
proposals for measuring and making progress toward the transitional
employment assistance outcomes during the succeeding three-year period.
(4) The comprehensive annual program report to the Governor, the
House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor, and the Senate
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor shall include all information
that the board deems necessary for determining progress in achieving the
outcomes.
(5) Information shall be provided for the state, each employment
opportunity district, and each county.
(6) The report shall also include all information requested by
resolution of the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and
Human Services and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.
(7) This report shall include a copy of all federal monthly,
quarterly, and annual reports submitted by the department regarding the
Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program.
(d) The House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human
Services and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor shall
report annually to the General Assembly their findings and recommendations
regarding the program.

SECTION 117. Arkansas Code § 20-76-113(c)(3)(A), concerning outcomes
for the Transitional Employment Assistance Program and the Arkansas Work Pays
Program, is amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) On the forty-fifth day after the end of the federal
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
fiscal year, the report shall be submitted to the Governor, and to the Chair
of the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Chair of
the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor, and the Speaker of
the House of Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he
or she deems appropriate.

SECTION 118. Arkansas Code § 20-76-404(a)(3), concerning financial
assistance by the Department of Human Services, is amended to read as
follows:
(b)(1) The Department of Human Services shall certify to the Governor,
the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human Services,
and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor when the
support services necessary for program recipients to obtain employment or
participate in allowable work activities are available.

SECTION 119. Arkansas Code § 20-76-404(i)(4), concerning financial
assistance by the Department of Human Services, is amended to read as
follows:
(4) The board shall submit a report to the Governor, and the
Chair of the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the
Chair of the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor, and the
Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the committee or
committees that he or she deems appropriate that reports on the outcomes of
the home visits and provides separate information for families who left
transitional assistance due to noncompliance and time limits.

SECTION 120. Arkansas Code § 20-76-410(d), concerning administrative
sanctions related to transitional employment assistance, is amended to read
as follows:
(d) The department shall include in the comprehensive annual program
report information on the families sanctioned and the outcomes of the home
visits to the Governor, and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare,
and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor, and
the Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the committee
or committees he or she deems appropriate.

02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
SECTION 121. Arkansas Code § 20-76-437 is amended to read as follows:
20-76-437. Reporting — Transitional employment assistance.
The Department of Human Services shall report periodically to the House
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on
Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems
appropriate regarding the provision of services to Transitional Employment
Assistance Program recipients.

SECTION 122. Arkansas Code § 20-76-444(d)(2), concerning the Arkansas
Work Pays Program, is amended to read as follows:
(2) If the Arkansas Workforce Development Board certifies to the
Governor and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and notifies the
Legislative Council, the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor, and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human
Services that the action is necessary to avoid the number of families
receiving Arkansas Work Pays Program cash assistance going over three
thousand (3,000), it may authorize a reduction of the months for which
families may receive cash assistance or other supportive services.

SECTION 123. Arkansas Code § 20-76-804 is amended to read as follows:
20-76-804. Reporting requirement.
(a) The Department of Human Services shall report the department's
implementation of the employment and training program requirement under § 20-
76-803 one (1) time per calendar quarter to the House Committee on Public
Health, Welfare, and Labor Speaker of the House of Representatives for
assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate.
(b) The department shall develop and submit a report containing
statistics of participation in the employment and training program one (1)
time per calendar quarter to the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare,
and Labor Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the
committee or committees he or she deems appropriate.

SECTION 124. Arkansas Code § 20-77-111(b)(2), concerning compilations
of data on the Arkansas Medicaid Program, is amended to read as follows:
(2) It shall include other comparisons in the format as may be
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
requested by the Legislative Council, the House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor and Human Services, and the Senate Committee on Public
Health, Welfare, and Labor or appropriate subcommittees thereof to which the
reports are to be delivered.

SECTION 125. Arkansas Code § 20-77-406(e), concerning prescription
limits under the Arkansas Medicaid Program, is amended to read as follows:
(e) Quarterly, the department shall report on the progress and
implementation of this section to:
(1) The Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; and
(2) The House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor
Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the committee or
committees he or she deems appropriate.

SECTION 126. Arkansas Code § 20-77-2513(c)(1), concerning the
Enterprise Fraud Program, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) Beginning October 1, 2014, the office shall provide quarterly
reports, or more frequent reports if requested by and of the following
recipients, to:
(A) The cochairs of the Joint Performance Review
Committee;
(B) The Chair of the House Committee on State Agencies and
Governmental Affairs;
(C)(B) The Chair of the Senate Committee on State Agencies
and Governmental Affairs;
(D) The Chair of the House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor; and
(E)(C) The Chair of the Senate Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor; and
(D) The Speaker of the House of Representatives for
assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate.

SECTION 127. Arkansas Code § 20-78-206(e), concerning the Division of
Child Care and Early Childhood Education, is amended to read as follows:
(e) All rules promulgated pursuant to this section shall be reviewed
by the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth or an appropriate
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
subcommittee thereof and the Subcommittee on Children and Youth of the House
Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs
Public Health and Human Services or an appropriate subcommittee thereof.

SECTION 128. Arkansas Code § 20-78-501(d)(1), concerning the
membership of the Arkansas Early Childhood Commission, is amended to read as
follows:
(1) The Chair of the Subcommittee on Children and Youth of the
House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military
Affairs Public Health and Human Services or his or her designee;

SECTION 129. Arkansas Code § 20-81-104(a)(3), concerning the Arkansas
Veterans Commission, is amended to read as follows:
(3) Promote and advance the interests of Arkansas veterans by
meeting and acting as an advisory board to the General Assembly on all
matters affecting Arkansas veterans, their dependents, and survivors,
including without limitation by meeting with the members of the House
Legislative, Military and Veterans Affairs Permanent Subcommittee of the
House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative Veterans and
Military Affairs; and

SECTION 130. Arkansas Code § 20-82-211(a)(5)(H)(ii)(g), concerning the
Child Welfare Ombudsman Division of the Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic
Violence Commission, is amended to read as follows:
(g) House Committee on Aging, Children and
Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs Speaker of the House of
Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems
appropriate; and

SECTION 131. Arkansas Code § 20-85-101(c), concerning the Family
Treatment and Rehabilitation Program for Addicted Women and their Children,
is amended to read as follows:
(c) The program shall report quarterly to the Subcommittee on Children
and Youth of the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative
and Military Affairs and the Senate Committee on Children and Youth and the
Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the committee or
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
committees he or she deems appropriate.

SECTION 132. Arkansas Code § 21-5-403 is amended to read as follows:
21-5-403. Report of Director of the Employee Benefits Division.
The Director of the Employee Benefits Division shall report upon
request to the House Committee on Insurance and Commerce, Insurance, Labor
and Licensing, and Public Transportation and the Senate Committee on
Insurance and Commerce regarding the State and Public School Life and Health
Insurance Program.

SECTION 133. Arkansas Code § 21-5-414(a), concerning state
contributions to the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance
Program, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Department of Transformation and Shared Services shall seek
the advice of the Legislative Council and the House Committee on Insurance
and Commerce, Insurance, Labor and Licensing, and Transportation and the
Senate Committee on Insurance and Commerce before additional state
contributions can be made to the State and Public School Life and Health
Insurance Program on behalf of state employees.

SECTION 134. Arkansas Code § 21-9-203(b)(2), concerning conflicts of
interest of the Attorney General, is amended to read as follows:
(2) When situations arise in which the Attorney General feels
that a conflict of interest exists and therefore must decline representation
of the officer or employee, the Attorney General shall prepare a report that
he or she shall submit to the House Committee on Judiciary and Senate
Committee on Judiciary and the Speaker of the House of Representatives for
assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate, in
which he or she shall recite the reasons for the conflict of interest and the
reasons his or her office declined representation.

SECTION 135. Arkansas Code § 23-61-1011(b)(1), concerning the
membership of the Health and Economic Outcomes Accountability Oversight
Advisory Panel, is amended to read as follows:
(1) The following members of the General Assembly:
(A) The Chair of the Senate Committee on Public Health,
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
Welfare, and Labor;
(B) The Chair of the House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor and Human Services;
(C) The Chair of the Senate Committee on Education;
(D) The Chair of the House Committee on Education;
(E) The Chair of the Senate Committee on Insurance and
Commerce;
(F) The Chair of the House Committee on Insurance and
Commerce, Insurance, Labor and Licensing, and Public Transportation;
(G) An at-large member of the Senate appointed by the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate;
(H) An at-large member of the House of Representatives
appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;
(I) An at-large member of the Senate appointed by the
minority leader of the Senate; and
(J) An at-large member of the House of Representatives
appointed by the minority leader of the House of Representatives;

SECTION 136. Arkansas Code § 23-65-403 is amended to read as follows:
23-65-403. Committees' approval of agreements or compacts required.
A multistate agreement or compact entered into by the Insurance
Commissioner shall be:
(1) Considered by the Senate Committee on Insurance and Commerce
and the House Committee on Insurance and Commerce, Insurance, Labor and
Licensing, and Public Transportation; and
(2) Reviewed and approved by the Legislative Council.

SECTION 137. Arkansas Code § 23-67-304(k)(5)(C), concerning the
Arkansas Workers' Compensation Insurance Plan, is amended to read as follows:
(C) A report of this review and action taken to improve
plan performance shall be made to the Legislative Council, and the House
Committee on Insurance and Commerce and the Senate Committee on Insurance and
Commerce, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to
the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate no later than
September 1 after the calendar year reviewed.

02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
SECTION 138. Arkansas Code § 23-67-313(b) and (c), concerning
competitive selection, are amended to read as follows:
(b) The commissioner shall review the plan operations to ensure
compliance with this act. The commissioner shall review and report to the
Legislative Council, and the Senate Committee on Insurance and Commerce, and
the House Committee on Insurance and Commerce Speaker of the House of
Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems
appropriate by September 1 of each year, with the first report to be
submitted no later than September 1, 1997, including, but not limited to, the
following information:
(1) Competitive selection of the administrator and servicing
carriers;
(2) Plan operating performance and service in accordance with
the intent of this act, including performance reviews of the administrator,
servicing carriers, and plan rules;
(3) Proper authority and independence of the Arkansas office to
properly perform and secure prompt, fair, and reasonable service as required
by this act; and
(4) Coverage provided by the plan in other states, including
evidence providing that carriers promptly provide coverage for employees of
Arkansas employers working in other states as provided in this act.
(c) The commissioner is encouraged to hold public hearings as needed
to assist in achieving the objectives of this act and to assist with the
review and report provided to the Legislative Council and the Senate
Committee on Insurance and Commerce and the House Committee on Insurance and
Commerce under subsection (b) of this section.

SECTION 139. Arkansas Code § 23-79-1503(c), concerning rules on
coverage for craniofacial anomalies, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The department shall submit biannual reports to the Chair of the
House Committee on Insurance and Commerce and the Chair of the Senate
Committee on Insurance and Commerce and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems
appropriate.

SECTION 140. Arkansas Code § 23-79-1902 is amended to read as follows:
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
23-79-1902. Interdisciplinary panel — University of Arkansas for
Medical Sciences.
(a) The University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences has partnered with
Arkansas Children's Hospital and the National Institute of Mental Health for
the establishment and operation of a clinic that currently serves patients
with pediatric acute-onset neuropsychiatric syndrome, also known as “PANS”,
and pediatric autoimmune neuropsychiatric disorder associated with
streptococcal infections, also known as “PANDAS”.
(b)(1) The University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences shall organize
an interdisciplinary panel incorporating all components of those affected by
PANS/PANDAS, including without limitation working with national
organizations.
(2) The interdisciplinary panel under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section shall include:
(A) A member at large from the Arkansas PANS/PANDAS
Advisory Council;
(B) A member at large who is a medical professional with a
minimum experience of two (2) years working with PANS/PANDAS patients and who
is recommended by the Arkansas PANS/PANDAS Advisory Council with final
approval by the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences; and
(C) A member at large who is a medical director or medical
officer from an insurance company licensed in this state to assist in the
development of diagnostic criteria for future insurance coverage purposes.
(c) An interdisciplinary team shall be established to create a
protocol for the treatment of and diagnostic framework for the coverage of
PANS and PANDAS by June 1, 2019, to allow for the assignment of an
International Classification of Diseases code, such as an ICD-9 code or other
applicable medical code for insurance coverage purposes.
(d) The interdisciplinary team shall report to the Senate Committee on
Public Health, Welfare, and Labor, the House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor, the Senate Committee on Insurance and Commerce, and the
House Committee on Insurance and Commerce no later than August 31, 2019.
(e) Once the interdisciplinary team determines appropriate diagnostic
criteria for the protocol, a final report with recommendations shall be
submitted to the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor, the
House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor, the Senate Committee on
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
Insurance and Commerce, the House Committee on Insurance and Commerce, and
the General Assembly to include recommendations concerning mandating
insurance coverage for the treatment of PANS and PANDAS for the next
scheduled regular session that convenes after the submission of the report or
the Governor is encouraged to add the recommendation to the call of any
special session that is convened before the next scheduled regular session.
(f)(c) The expectation for the interdisciplinary team is that:
(1) Every available tool will be utilized to make healthcare
services for the treatment of PANS and PANDAS available statewide through the
University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences network and available services,
including telemedicine; and
(2) Once the interdisciplinary team determines the diagnostic
criteria for purposes of insurance coverage, all insurance companies and
health benefit plans that are licensed in this state shall provide coverage
for the treatment of PANS and PANDAS diagnosed according to the established
diagnostic criteria recommended by the interdisciplinary team.
(g) The goal of the interdisciplinary team is to have the diagnostic
criteria finalized and ready to be presented at the December 2019 meeting of
the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor, the House
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor, the Senate Committee on
Insurance and Commerce, and the House Committee on Insurance and Commerce.

SECTION 141. Arkansas Code § 23-92-509(c), concerning rules under the
Arkansas Pharmacy Benefits Manager Licensure Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(c)(1) In addition to the filing requirements under the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., and under § 10-3-309, the
State Insurance Department shall file a proposed rule or a proposed amendment
to an existing rule under this subchapter with the Senate Committee on
Insurance and Commerce and the House Committee on Insurance and Commerce,
Insurance, Labor and Licensing, and Public Transportation at least thirty
(30) days before the expiration of the period for public comment under the
Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.
(2) The Senate Committee on Insurance and Commerce and the House
Committee on Insurance and Commerce, Insurance, Labor and Licensing, and
Public Transportation shall review the proposed rule or proposed amendment to
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
an existing rule within forty-five (45) days of the date the proposed rule or
proposed amendment to an existing rule is filed with the Senate Committee on
Insurance and Commerce and the House Committee on Insurance and Commerce,
Insurance, Labor and Licensing, and Public Transportation.
(3)(A) If the department adopts an emergency rule under this
subchapter, in addition to the filing requirements under the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., and under § 10-3-309, the
department shall notify the following individuals of the emergency rule and
provide each individual with a copy of the rule within five (5) business days
of adopting the rule:
(i) The Speaker of the House of Representatives;
(ii) The President Pro Tempore of the Senate;
(iii) The Chair of the Senate Committee on Insurance and
Commerce; and
(iv) The Chair of the House Committee on Insurance and
Commerce, Insurance, Labor and Licensing, and Public Transportation.
(B) The Senate Committee on Insurance and Commerce and the
House Committee on Insurance and Commerce, Insurance, Labor and Licensing,
and Public Transportation shall review the emergency rule within forty-five
(45) days of the date that the emergency rule is provided to the Chair of the
Senate Committee on Insurance and Commerce and the Chair of the House
Committee on Insurance and Commerce, Insurance, Labor and Licensing, and
Public Transportation.

SECTION 142. Arkansas Code § 23-99-422(f)(2), concerning benefits for
mental illness or substance use disorders delivered through a psychiatric
collaborative care model, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Beginning on September 1, 2023, and on a quarterly basis
thereafter, the Arkansas Medicaid Program shall report to the Senate
Committee on Insurance and Commerce and the House Committee on Insurance and
Commerce Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the
committee or committees he or she deems appropriate concerning the progress
and activities under subdivision (f)(1) of this section.

SECTION 143. Arkansas Code § 23-102-110(b), concerning coverages
available through the Arkansas Earthquake Authority, is amended to read as
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
follows:
(b) If there are no approved insurers in the program or if after
notice and hearing, the Board of the Arkansas Earthquake Authority or the
Insurance Commissioner finds that the program rates substantially exceed
rates that could be offered by the authority, and the board or commissioner
finds after a hearing that it is in the best interests of Arkansas citizens
to issue coverage directly through the authority, and with the concurrence of
the House Committee on Insurance and Commerce, Insurance, Labor and
Licensing, and Public Transportation and the Senate Committee on Insurance
and Commerce, if the General Assembly is in session, or the concurrence of
the House Committee on Insurance and Commerce, Insurance, Labor and
Licensing, and Public Transportation and the Senate Committee on Insurance
and Commerce, if the General Assembly is not in session, the board shall
proceed to offer coverage through the authority to potential insureds.

SECTION 144. Arkansas Code § 25-1-119(c)(3)(A), concerning services
and studies by state agencies, boards, and commissions concerning mortality
disparities, is amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) The entities listed in subdivision (c)(2) of this section
shall submit an annual report to the Chair of the House Committee on Public
Health, Welfare, and Labor, the Chair of the Senate Committee on Public
Health, Welfare, and Labor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives for
assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate, and
the Governor to be delivered on or before October 1 of each year.

SECTION 145. Arkansas Code § 25-1-120(d)(1)(D), concerning
comprehensive cross-sector collaboration by state agencies, boards, and
commissions concerning health disparities, is amended to read as follows:
(D) Compile an annual report of comprehensive collaborative
initiatives using the standardized format created under this subsection and
submit the report to the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor Speaker of
the House of Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he
or she deems appropriate no later than October 1 of each year.

SECTION 146. Arkansas Code § 25-10-102(c)(1)(C), concerning the
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
organization of the Department of Human Services, is amended to read as
follows:
(C) Before implementation of any reorganization, the
secretary shall obtain the advice of the House Committee on State Agencies,
and Governmental Affairs Transformation, and Shared Services and the Senate
Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs.

SECTION 147. Arkansas Code § 25-10-136 is amended to read as follows:
25-10-136. Private service contract notice required.
(a) The Department of Human Services shall notify the Senate Interim
Committee on Children and Youth and the House Committee on Aging, Children
and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs Public Health and Human Services
prior to privatizing any functions or responsibilities of the Division of
Youth Services.
(b) The report shall be in writing and shall be submitted to the
Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth and the House Committee on
Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs Public Health and
Human Services at least sixty (60) days prior to entering into a contract
with a private business entity.
(c) In the event the General Assembly is in session, the Secretary of
the Department of Human Services shall provide the report to the House
Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs
Public Health and Human Services and the Chair of the Senate Interim
Committee on Children and Youth.

SECTION 148. Arkansas Code § 25-10-137(b), concerning requirements for
private service contract evaluation, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The department shall report to the Senate Interim Committee on
Children and Youth and the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth,
Legislative and Military Affairs or appropriate subcommittees thereof and the
Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the committee,
committees, subcommittee, or subcommittees he or she deems appropriate at
least annually regarding the performance evaluation of each contract.

SECTION 149. Arkansas Code § 25-10-138(b), concerning education
requirements for certain Division of Youth Services employees, is amended to
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
read as follows:
(b) No rule pertaining to education requirements for youth service
workers or security officers promulgated hereafter by the division shall be
effective until reviewed by the Legislative Council, the House Committee on
Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs Public Health and
Human Services, and the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth or
appropriate subcommittees thereof of the General Assembly.

SECTION 150. Arkansas Code § 25-10-139(b), concerning training
requirements for certain Division of Youth Services employees, is amended to
read as follows:
(b) No rule pertaining to the training required of youth service
workers and security officers promulgated hereafter by the division shall be
effective until reviewed by the Legislative Council, the House Committee on
Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs Public Health and
Human Services, and the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth or
appropriate subcommittees thereof of the General Assembly.

SECTION 151. Arkansas Code § 25-15-503 is amended to read as follows:
25-15-503. Additional rule procedure.
(a)(1) In addition to filing requirements under the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., and § 10-3-309, the
Department of Human Services shall, at least thirty (30) days before the
expiration of the period for public comment, file a proposed rule impacting
state Medicaid costs or a proposed amendment to an existing rule impacting
state Medicaid costs with the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human
Services.
(2) A review of the proposed rule or proposed amendment to an
existing rule by the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor
and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human
Services shall occur within forty-five (45) days of the date the proposed
rule or proposed amendment to an existing rule is filed with the Senate
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the House Committee on
Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human Services.
(b)(1) If adopting an emergency rule impacting state Medicaid costs,
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
in addition to the filing requirements under the Arkansas Administrative
Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., and § 10-3-309, the department shall
notify the following individuals of the emergency rule and provide each
individual with a copy of the rule within five (5) business days of adopting
the rule:
(A) The Speaker of the House of Representatives;
(B) The President Pro Tempore of the Senate;
(C) The Chair of the Senate Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor; and
(D) The Chair of the House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor and Human Services.
(2) A review of the emergency rule by the Senate Committee on
Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor and Human Services shall occur within forty-five (45) days
of the date that the emergency rule is provided to the Chair of the Senate
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Chair of the House
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human Services.

SECTION 152. Arkansas Code § 25-15-602 is amended to read as follows:
25-15-602. Rules — Additional rule procedure.
(a)(1) In addition to complying with the requirements under the
Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., and § 10-3-309, a
licensing entity shall, at least thirty (30) days before the expiration of
the period for public comment, file a rule regarding scope of practice with
the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the House
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human Services.
(2) The Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor
and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human
Services shall review a rule regarding scope of practice within forty-five
(45) days of the date the rule regarding scope of practice is filed with the
Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the House Committee
on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human Services.
(b)(1) If adopting an emergency rule regarding scope of practice under
§ 10-3-309, the licensing entity shall notify the following individuals of
the emergency rule regarding scope of practice and provide each individual
with a copy of the emergency rule regarding scope of practice within five (5)
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
business days of adopting the emergency rule regarding scope of practice:
(A) The Speaker of the House of Representatives;
(B) The President Pro Tempore of the Senate;
(C) The Chair of the Senate Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor; and
(D) The Chair of the House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor and Human Services.
(2) The Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor
and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Human
Services shall review the emergency rule regarding scope of practice within
forty-five (45) days of the date that the emergency rule regarding scope of
practice is provided to the Chair of the Senate Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor and the Chair of the House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor and Human Services.

SECTION 153. Arkansas Code § 25-38-203(a)(13), concerning the powers
and duties of the Department of Agriculture, is amended to read as follows:
(13) Develop a report to be submitted each year on January 1 to the
Governor, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic
Development, and the House Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic
Development Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the
committee or committees he or she deems appropriate, concerning the
activities and programs of the:
(A) Arkansas Catfish Promotion Board;
(B) Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board;
(C) Arkansas Rice Research and Promotion Board;
(D) Arkansas Wheat Promotion Board;
(E) Arkansas Corn and Grain Sorghum Promotion Board; and
(F) Arkansas Beef Council.

SECTION 154. Arkansas Code § 25-38-210(2), concerning reporting on
agricultural exchanges, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Annually report the department's findings under subdivision (1) of
this section to the House Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic
Development and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic
Development and the Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate.

SECTION 155. Arkansas Code § 26-18-902(c), concerning the Tax Advisory
Council, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The council will develop and submit a report to the chairs of the
House Committee on Revenue and Taxation and the Senate Committee on Revenue
and Taxation and the Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment
to the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate.

SECTION 156. Arkansas Code § 26-18-1106(b)(7), concerning the duties
of the Chief Commissioner of the Tax Appeals Commission, is amended to read
as follows:
(7) Submit an annual report to the Speaker of the House of
Representatives for assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems
appropriate, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Chair of the House
Committee on Judiciary, the Chair of the Senate Committee on Judiciary, the
cochairs of the Legislative Council, the Governor, and the Secretary of the
Department of Inspector General that contains the following information for
the year that is the subject of the report:
(A) The case load of the commission;
(B) The number of petitions filed;
(C) The number of claims settled;
(D) The number of decisions the commission rendered;
(E) The number of decisions rendered:
(i) In favor of the Department of Finance and
Administration;
(ii) In favor of the taxpayer; and
(iii) Partially in favor of the department and
partially in favor of the taxpayer;
(F) The number of matters heard:
(i) In person;
(ii) By teleconference or videoconference;
(iii) Using a combination of in-person and either
teleconference or videoconference means; and
(iv) Solely on the documents filed with the
commission; and
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
(G) The average time for a claim to be processed from the
petition's being filed to a decision's being rendered, calculated for each
type of hearing conducted by the commission.

SECTION 157. Arkansas Code § 26-26-310(d), concerning the
certification of the amount of property tax reduction, is amended to read as
follows:
(d) On or before January 30 each year, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State shall submit a report to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the
Speaker of the House of Representatives for assignment to the committee or
committees he or she deems appropriate, the members of the Senate Committee
on Revenue and Taxation, the members of the House Committee on Revenue and
Taxation, the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Attorney General, the
Secretary of State, the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the
Commissioner of State Lands stating:
(1) The balance of the Property Tax Relief Trust Fund;
(2) Whether the fund could support an increase of the homestead
property tax credit allowed under § 26-26-1118; and
(3) If the fund has a balance sufficient to support an increase
of the homestead property tax credit allowed under § 26-26-1118, the amount
of increase that the fund could support.

SECTION 158. Arkansas Code § 26-58-122(c), concerning the procedures
to be followed upon failure to pay severance taxes due the Arkansas Forestry
Commission, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) In the event the secretary fails to report to the commission
within the time specified or the commission disagrees with the findings of
the secretary, the State Forester shall file with the Governor, the
Legislative Council, and the House Committee on Revenue and Taxation Finance
and Administration and the Senate Committee on Revenue and Taxation a report
of the matter.
(2) The Governor shall then conduct an investigation into such
failure to report by the secretary or disagreement as to tax liability with
the commission, take whatever measures the Governor deems necessary to
rectify the situation, and shall notify the Legislative Council and the House
Committee on Revenue and Taxation Finance and Administration and the Senate
02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040

HB1573
Committee on Revenue and Taxation of the Governor's decision.

SECTION 159. Arkansas Code § 26-60-104 is amended to read as follows:
26-60-104. Rules.
The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration is
authorized to promulgate rules to carry out the purposes of this chapter
which shall be submitted to the House Committee on City, County, and Local
Affairs, Parks, Heritage, Tourism, and Game and Fish and the Senate Committee
on City, County, and Local Affairs.

SECTION 160. Arkansas Code § 27-16-509(e)(1)(A), concerning reciprocal
agreements, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1)(A) If the secretary enters into a reciprocal agreement under
this section, then he or she shall submit a report to the following:
(i) The cochairs of the Legislative Council;
(ii) The Chair of the House Committee on Public
Transportation and the Chair of the Senate Committee on Public
Transportation, Technology, and Legislative Affairs;
(iii) The Speaker of the House of Representatives
for assignment to the committee or committees he or she deems appropriate;
and
(iii)(iv) The Director of the Bureau of Legislative
Research.













02/24/2025 4:31:43 PM MBM040